Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF684.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 256.01, is amended by adding a subdivision to read: new text begin Subd. 44. new text end new text begin Notification of federal approval; report. new text end new text begin (a) For any provision over which the commissioner has jurisdiction and that has an effective date contingent upon federal approval, whether the contingency is expressed in an effective date, in the text of a statutory provision, or in the text of an uncodified section of session law, the commissioner must notify the revisor of statutes of which enacted provisions contain such contingent federal approval and when federal approval is obtained for any such provision according to paragraphs (b) and (c). new text end new text begin (b) By July 1 of each year, the commissioner must provide the revisor of statutes; the director of the House Research Department; and the director of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis with a report containing a complete list of all provisions enacted since the preceding July 1 with an effective date contingent on federal approval. new text end new text begin (c) By September 1 of each year, the commissioner must provide the revisor of statutes; the director of the House Research Department; and the director of Senate Counsel, Research and Fiscal Analysis with a report containing a complete list of all statutory provisions previously enacted with an effective date contingent on federal approval. The commissioner must identify in the report which, if any, provisions received federal approval since the preceding September 1 and the date that federal approval for each provision was received. If no provisions have received federal approval since the preceding September 1, the report must state that fact. The revisor of statutes may authorize the commissioner to remove federally approved provisions from subsequent reports submitted. new text end new text begin (d) The reports in paragraphs (b) and (c) must be provided in a form prescribed by the revisor of statutes. new text end new text begin (e) An employee in the Department of Human Services who is responsible for identifying and tracking federal approval of provisions must attest to the accuracy of the reports in a manner prescribed by the revisor of statutes. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end